src-fst-ext-TRmorph-analyzer.cpp.lexc.md
from adj
































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/ext-TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-tur/blob/main/../src/fst/ext-TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc)</small>
